Massachusetts, session 194th, H230.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 18C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 2 the following section:-
Section 2A. In addition to the powers set forth in section 2, and notwithstanding section 3
of chapter 12 or any other law to the contrary, the child advocate, or the child advocate’s
designee, may represent, appear, intervene in or bring an action on behalf the commonwealth or
of any child in any proceeding before any state or federal court, tribunal, agency, board or
commission in which matters related to this chapter are in issue.
of 1